Wyoming, session 2026, HB0050.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-9-113 and 22-26-101(a) by creating
a new paragraph (xii) are amended to read:

22-9-113. Completing and return of ballot.

(a) Upon receipt, a qualified elector shall mark the
ballot and sign the affidavit. The ballot shall then be
HB0050

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0042
sealed in the inner ballot envelope and mailed or delivered
to the clerk subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section.

(b) No person shall deliver a ballot to the clerk
unless the person is the qualified elector who is casting
the ballot, the person is immediate family of the qualified
elector or the person is an employee of a residential care
facility authorized to deliver a ballot under subsection
(c) of this section. This subsection shall not apply to
ballots that are mailed to the clerk.

(c) An employee of a residential care facility,
including nursing homes, assisted living facilities, adult
family homes and community-based residential facilities or
a bona fide caregiver may deliver absentee ballots on
behalf of not more than five (5) qualified electors per
election residing in that facility as provided in this
subsection. For each absentee ballot delivered on behalf of
a qualified elector under this subsection, the employee
shall concurrently file an affidavit with the county clerk
on a form prescribed by the secretary of state attesting
under penalty of perjury that, among other requirements
HB0050

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0042
specified by the secretary of state, the employee is
authorized to deliver the ballot on behalf of the qualified
elector under this subsection. Not later than thirty (30)
days following each election, the county clerk shall
transmit copies of all affidavits received under this
subsection pertaining to that election to the secretary of
state.

(d) If a county clerk, county canvassing board member
or other election official becomes aware of a violation of
subsection (b) or (c) of this section before ballot
tabulation, any ballot that is delivered in violation of
subsection (b) or (c) of this section shall not be
tabulated. If a ballot is improperly delivered to the
county clerk in violation of this section, the county clerk
shall attempt to provide notice to the qualified elector
that the qualified elector's ballot has not been tabulated.

22-26-101. Felony offenses generally.

(a) The following acts in connection with or related
to the election process or an election, if knowingly and
willfully committed, are felony offenses punishable by not
HB0050

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0042
more than five (5) years' imprisonment in the state
penitentiary or a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), or both:

(xii) Violating W.S. 22-9-113(b).

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0050